lucene/analysis/common/src/test/org/apache/lucene/analysis/hunspell/common-errors.aff
SET UTF-8

# add some suffix off-by-ones here, feel free to add more
# SFX A: wrong count, come up short on entries and stampede into SFX B.
# SFX B: wrong count, hit EOF
SFX A Y 2
SFX A 0 ing .
SFX B Y 2
SFX B 0 ed .
