lucene/analysis/common/src/test/org/apache/lucene/analysis/hunspell/common-errors.dic
# Dictionary for testing common mistakes to tolerate in dictionaries.
# Purpose is to test that we still behave well even with the common mistakes.
# Lucene parser seems to be really strict with these numbers.
# I wonder if we should just ignore them entirely and parse in a different way?
# Have the suspicion that maybe C hunspell just uses them as a "hint" to size data?
# Add more flags if you need to the "testword" for any more affix bugs found.
# Or add more words if the problem is instead around this file.
1
testword/AB
